Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 13 Limited Partnerships [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]
7-13-15.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-16.
Delivery of certificates to limited partners. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Upon the return by the secretary of state pursuant to §

7-13-13

of a certificate marked “Filed”, the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and each certificate of amendment or cancellation to each limited partner unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-16.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-17.
Admission of limited partners. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A person becomes a limited partner on the later of:

The date the original certificate of limited partnership is filed; or

The date stated in the records of the limited partnership as the date that person will become a limited partner.

After the filing of a limited partnership’s original certificate of limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner.

In the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, on the compliance with the partnership agreement, or if the partnership agreement does not so provide, on the written consent of all partners; and

In the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who has the power, as provided in §

7-13-42

, to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, on the exercise of that power and compliance with any conditions limiting the grant or exercise of the power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-17.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-18.
Voting — Rights of limited partners. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Subject to the provisions of §

7-13-19

, the partnership agreement may grant to all or a specified group of the limited partners the right to vote (on a per capita or other basis) on any matter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-18.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-19.
Liability to third parties. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in subsection (d), a limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership unless he or she is also a general partner or, in addition to the exercise of his or her rights and powers as a limited partner, he or she participates in the control of the business. However, if the limited partner participates in the control of the business, he or she is liable only to persons who establish by clear and convincing evidence that they transacted business with the limited partnership reasonably believing, based on the limited partner’s active conduct, that the limited partner is a general partner.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business regardless of the nature, extent, scope, number or frequency of the limited partner’s possessing or, regardless of whether or not the limited partner has the rights or powers, exercising or attempting to exercise one or more of the rights or powers or having or, regardless of whether or not the limited partner has the rights or powers, acting or attempting to act in one or more of the following capacities:

Being an independent contractor for or transacting business with, including being a contractor for, or being an agent or employee of, the limited partnership or a general partner, or being an officer, director or stockholder of a corporate general partner, or being a partner of a partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership, or being a fiduciary or beneficiary of an estate or trust that is a general partner;

Consulting with or advising a general partner regarding any matter, including the business of the limited partnership;

Acting as surety, guarantor or endorser for the limited partnership or a general partner, guaranteeing or assuming one or more obligations of a limited partnership or a general partner, borrowing money from the limited partnership or a general partner, lending money to the limited partnership or a general partner, or providing collateral for the limited partnership or a general partner;

Approving or disapproving an amendment to the partnership agreement;

Acting or causing the taking or refraining from the taking of any action, including by proposing, approving, consenting, or disapproving, by voting or otherwise, with respect to one or more of the following matters:

The dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership or an election to continue the limited partnership or an election to continue the business of a limited partnership;

The sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, pledge, or other transfer of or granting of a security interest in any asset or assets of the limited partnership;

The incurrence, renewal, refinancing, or repayment or other discharge of indebtedness by the limited partnership;

A change in the nature of the business;

The admission, removal, or retention of a general partner;

An amendment to the partnership agreement or certificate of limited partnership;

A matter related to the business of the limited partnership not otherwise enumerated in this subsection that the partnership agreement states, in writing, is subject to the approval or disapproval of limited partners;

Winding up the limited partnership pursuant to this chapter;

Exercising any right or power permitted to limited partners under this chapter and not specifically enumerated in this subsection;

The admission, removal, or retention of a limited partner;

A transaction or other matter involving an actual or potential conflict of interest;

The merger or consolidation of a limited partnership;

As to a limited partnership that is registered as an investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, any matter required by the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as amended, or the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission under that Act, to be approved by the holders of beneficial interests in an investment company, including the election of directors or trustees of the investment company, the approving or terminating of investment advisory or underwriting contracts, and the approving of auditors;

The indemnification of any partner or any other person; or

Any other matters that are stated in the partnership agreement or in any other agreement or in writing;

Taking any action required or permitted by law to bring or pursue or settle or otherwise terminate a derivative action in the right of the limited partnership;

Calling, requesting, attending, or participating in a meeting of partners or limited partners;

Serving on a committee of the limited partnership or the limited partners;

Serving on the board of directors or a committee of, consulting with or advising, being an officer, director, stockholder, partner, agent or employee of, or being a fiduciary for, any person in which the limited partnership has an interest; or

Exercising any right or power granted or permitted to limited partners under this chapter and not specifically enumerated in this subsection.

The enumeration in subsection (b) does not mean that the possession or exercise of any other powers by a limited partner constitutes participation by him or her in the business of the limited partnership.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subsection (a) by virtue of the fact that all or any part of the name of the limited partner is included in the name of the limited partnership.

This section does not create rights or powers of limited partners. The rights and powers may be created only by a certificate of limited partnership, a partnership agreement or any other agreement or in writing, or by other sections of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 2.

7-13-19.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-20.
Person erroneously believing him or herself a limited partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in subsection (b), a person who makes a contribution to a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that he or she has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not a general partner in the enterprise and is not bound by its obligations by reason of making the contribution, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, he or she:

Causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership or a certificate of amendment to be executed and filed; or

Withdraws from future equity participation in the enterprise by executing and filing in the office of the secretary of state a certificate declaring withdrawal under this section.

A person who makes a contribution of the kind described in subsection (a) is liable as a general partner to any third party who transacts business with the enterprise:

Before the person withdraws and an appropriate certificate is filed to show withdrawal, or

Before an appropriate certificate is filed to show his or her status as a limited partner and, in the case of an amendment, after expiration of the thirty (30) day period for filing an amendment relating to the person as a limited partner under §

7-13-9

, but in either case only if the third party actually believed in good faith that the person was a general partner at the time of the transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-20.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-21.
Information. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Each limited partner has the right to:

Inspect and copy any of the partnership records required to be maintained by §

7-13-5

; and

Obtain from the general partners from time to time upon reasonable demand:

True and full information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership,

Promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns for each year, and

Other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership that is just and reasonable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-21.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-22.
Admission of additional general partners. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

After the filing of a limited partnership’s original certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not provide for the admission of additional general partners, with the written consent of all partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-22.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-23.
Events of withdrawal. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as approved by the specific written consent of all partners at the time, a person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership on the happening of any of the following events:

The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in §

7-13-32

;

The general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership as provided in §

7-13-40

;

The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, the general partner:

Makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

Is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent;

Files a petition or answer seeking for himself or herself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation;

Files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegation of a petition filed against him or her in any proceeding of this nature; or

Seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his or her properties;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, one hundred and twenty (120) days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within ninety (90) days after the appointment without his or her consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his or her properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed or within ninety (90) days after the expiration of any stay, the appointment is not vacated;

In the case of a general partner who is a natural person:

His or her death; or

The entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating him or her incompetent to manage his or her person or his or her estate;

In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust (but not merely the substitution of a new trustee);

In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of a certificate of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the revocation of its charter; or

In the case of an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate’s entire interest in the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-23.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-24.
General rights, powers, and liabilities. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

Except as provided in this chapter a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners. Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-24.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-25.
Contributions by general partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of his or her participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-25.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-26.
Voting rights of general partners. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners the right to vote, on a per capita or any other basis, separately or with all or any class of the limited partners, on any matter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-26.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-27.
Form of contribution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-27.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-28.
Liability for contribution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner is obligated to the limited partnership to perform any promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if he or she is unable to perform because of death, disability, or any other reason. If a partner does not make the required contribution of property or services, he or she is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value (as stated in the records to be kept pursuant to §

7-13-5

) of the stated contribution that has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all the partners. Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited partnership who extends credit, or whose claim arises, after the filing of the certificate of limited partnership or an amendment to it that, in either case, reflects the obligation, and before the amendment or cancellation of it to reflect the compromise, may enforce the original obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-28.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-29.
Sharing of profits and losses. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners and the classes of partners in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not provide for allocation, profits and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to §

7-13-5

, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-29.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-30.
Sharing of distributions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not provide for allocation, distributions shall be made on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to §

7-13-5

, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-30.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-31.
Interim distributions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in this chapter, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before his or her withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-31.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-32.
Withdrawal of general partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-32.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-33.
Withdrawal of limited partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partner may withdraw from a limited partnership only at the time or upon the occurrence of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement and in accordance with the partnership agreement. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under applicable law, unless a partnership agreement provides otherwise, a limited partner may not withdraw from a limited partnership prior to the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4.

7-13-33.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-34.
Distribution upon withdrawal. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in this chapter, upon withdrawal any withdrawing partner is entitled to receive any distribution to which he or she is entitled under the partnership agreement and, if not otherwise provided in the agreement, he or she is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of his or her interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal based on his or her right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-34.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-35.
Distribution in kind. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in writing in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of his or her contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him or her exceeds a percentage of that asset that is equal to the percentage in which he or she shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-35.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-36.
Right to distribution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Subject to §§

7-13-37

and

7-13-47

, and unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement at the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he or she has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership as to the distribution. A partnership may provide for the establishment of a record date with respect to allocations and distributions by a limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1.

7-13-36.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-37.
Limitations on distribution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership shall not make a distribution to a partner to the extent that at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the limited partnership, exceed the fair value of the assets of the limited partnership, except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the limited partnership only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability.

A limited partner who received a distribution in violation of subsection (a), and who knew or reasonably should have known at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (a), is liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution. A limited partner who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (a) and who did not know and reasonably should not have known at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (a), is not liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (c), this subsection does not affect any obligation or liability of a limited partner under a partnership agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a limited partner who received a distribution from a limited partnership has no liability under this chapter or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three (3) years from the date of the distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1.

7-13-37.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 379, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-38.
[Repealed.]

7-13-38.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

Repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-39.
Nature of partnership interest. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership interest is personal property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-39.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-40.
Assignment of partnership interest. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner upon assignment of all his partnership interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-40.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-41.
Rights of creditor. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This chapter does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his or her partnership interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-41.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-42.
Rights of assignee to become limited partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that:

The assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in the partnership agreement; or

All other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this chapter. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of his or her assignor to make and return contributions as provided in this chapter. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time he or she became a limited partner.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his or her liability to the limited partnership under §§

7-13-14

and

7-13-28

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-42.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-43.
Power of estate of deceased or incompetent person. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him or her to be incompetent to manage his or her person or his or her property, the partner’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all the partner’s rights for the purpose of settling his or her estate or administering his or her property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-43.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-44.
Nonjudicial dissolution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

At the time or upon the happening of any of the events specified in the partnership agreement;

Written consent of all partners;

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, an event of withdrawal of a general partner unless at the time there is at least one other general partner and the partnership agreement permits the business of the limited partnership to be carried on by the remaining general partner and that partner does so, but the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of any event of withdrawal, if, within ninety (90) days after the withdrawal, a majority interest of the partners agrees in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one or more additional general partners if necessary or desired; or

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under §

7-13-45

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 13.

7-13-44.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 13; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-45.
Judicial dissolution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

On application by or for a partner the superior court may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-45.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-46.
Winding up. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs. The superior court may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs upon application of any partner, his or her legal representative, or assignee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-46.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-47.
Distribution of assets. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under §

7-13-31

or §

7-13-34

;

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under §

7-13-31

or

7-13-34

; and

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners, first for the return of their contributions and secondly, as to their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-47.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-48.
Applicable law. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Subject to the constitution of this state:

The laws of the state under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its limited partners, except as to foreign limited-liability partnerships, which shall be treated as if they were foreign limited partnerships;

A foreign limited partnership may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state; and

A certificate of registration does not authorize a foreign limited partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a limited partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 2.

7-13-48.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.